North Dakota, session 69, HB1129.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. APPROPRIATION - DEPARTMENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION - STUDENT
ATTENDANCE AND ABSENTEEISM - ONE-TIME FUNDING. There is appropriated out of any
moneys in the general fund in the state treasury, not otherwise appropriated, the sum of
$1,000,000, or so much of the sum as may be necessary, to the department of public instruction
for the purpose of addressing student attendance and absenteeism in kindergarten through
grade twelve public schools, for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30,
2027.
Page No. 1 25.0433.02000